Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.80 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “State agency” means any board, commission, department,


authority, bureau, office, or other entity of this state created


with authority to make rules or formulate orders as defined in the


Administrative Procedures Act; and


2. “Cost of labor” means a lump sum or hourly rate charged for


an employee’s expertise, time, and skill in performing a specific


duty.



Req. No. 2991 Page 1


B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, no state


agency, when performing a service for or on behalf of another state


agency, shall charge the state agency receiving the service for the


cost of labor associated with such service.


C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to services


performed by employees of the Office of the State Auditor and


Inspector.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2991 MSBB 1/8/2026 1:08:11 PM





















Req. No. 2991 Page 2